Tennessee statutes. Title 11 Natural Areas and Recreation
Part 2

Jogging Trails

11-12-201. Title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Jogging Act of 1980.”

Acts 1980, ch. 835, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 53-6901, 68-51-101.

11-12-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of health, who shall administer this part;

“Jogging trail” means any trail at least one (1) mile in length; and

“State land” includes any land owned, operated, or under the control or supervision of any department or agency of the state.

Acts 1980, ch. 835, § 3; T.C.A., §§ 53-6902, 68-51-102.

11-12-203. Survey of land available for jogging trails.

Each agency of state government shall forward to the commissioner a survey of any state land under its control or supervision. The survey shall contain the following information:

The location of any tract or parcel of land sufficient in size to contain a jogging trail;

A statement of the suitability of the land for use by joggers and, if unsuitable, specific reasons for its unsuitability; and

A list of any obstacles that would have to be removed or altered to permit the establishment of a jogging trail on such land.

The department of transportation shall not be required to survey all lands currently in use as an existing highway, except as provided in this part.

Acts 1980, ch. 835, § 4; T.C.A., §§ 53-6903, 68-51-103.

11-12-204. Citizens' recommendations for possible jogging trails.

Any citizens' group or organization interested in running or jogging may recommend to the commissioner the use of any state land for designation as a jogging trail. Upon the recommendation of any citizens' group or organization to designate any existing highway as a jogging trail, the department of transportation, upon notice from the commissioner, shall within sixty (60) days complete the survey as required in § 11-12-203.

Acts 1980, ch. 835, § 5; T.C.A., §§ 53-6904, 68-51-104.

11-12-205. Designation of jogging trails.

The commissioner shall review the land surveys prepared by each department or agency, together with the recommendations of any interested citizens group, and shall designate such lands as the commissioner deems suitable as a jogging trail. In designating lands as jogging trails, the commissioner shall consider such factors as accessibility, local interest, safety, and the ability to obtain construction or maintenance assistance from interested groups. In counties with populations of fifty thousand (50,000) or more according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the commissioner shall designate as jogging trails, all lands that are suitable so as to place emphasis on jogging in these counties.

Acts 1980, ch. 835, § 6; T.C.A., §§ 53-6905, 68-51-105.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

11-12-206. Posting of jogging trails — Maintenance.

All lands designated by the commissioner for use as jogging trails shall be posted as such and shall be open to the public for jogging or running at all times unless the commissioner, in cooperation with the department or agency, shall exclude certain periods because of safety reasons.

The posting of designated jogging trails and the maintenance of trails in suitable condition, including removal or alteration of obstacles, shall be the responsibility of the agency having jurisdiction over the property comprising the trail.

Acts 1980, ch. 835, § 7; T.C.A., §§ 53-6906, 68-51-106.

11-12-207. Removal of designation.

Any department or agency may appeal to the governor to remove any state land under its control or supervision from the designation as a jogging trail.

Acts 1980, ch. 835, § 8; T.C.A., §§ 53-6907, 68-51-107.

11-12-208. Funding.

Any expenditures required under this part shall be from departmental appropriations made in the general appropriations act.

Acts 1980, ch. 835, § 9; T.C.A., §§ 53-6908, 68-51-108.